Tennessee, session 114, HB0579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1301(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) "Crime of violence" includes any degree of murder, voluntary manslaughter,
aggravated rape, rape, rape of a child, aggravated rape of a child, aggravated sexual
battery, robbery, aggravated robbery, especially aggravated robbery, burglary,
aggravated burglary, especially aggravated burglary, aggravated assault, kidnapping,
aggravated kidnapping, especially aggravated kidnapping, carjacking, trafficking for
commercial sex act, especially aggravated sexual exploitation, felony child abuse, and
aggravated child abuse;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0579
000398
- 1 -